bg-BG: Тип маркировка на линийката: Линии за ъгли; Централна линия; Ъглови маркировки; Мрежа; Висококонтрастни маркировки; Номерирани деления; Водачи за успоредни линии; Водачи за резерва за шев; Стандартни деления; Друго
ro-RO: Stilul de marcare al riglei: Linii de unghi; Linie centrală; Marcaje pentru colțuri; Grilă; Marcaje cu contrast ridicat; Trepte numerotate; Ghidaje cu linii paralele; Ghidaje pentru margini de coasere; Marcaje standard de gradație; Altele
nb: Linjalmerkingsstil: Vinkellinjer; Senterlinje; Hjørnemarkeringer; Rutenett; Høykontrastmarkeringer; Nummerert inndeling; Parallelle styrelinjer; Styrelinjer for sømmonn; Standard skalastreker; Annet
nl: Liniaal markeerstijl: Hoeklijnen; Middellijn; Hoekmarkeringen; Grid; Contrastrijke markeringen; Genummerde stappen; Hulplijnen voor parallelle lijnen; Naadtoeslaghulplijnen; Standaard maatstreepjes; Overig
zh-TW: 尺標記樣式: 角度線; 中心線; 角落標記; 網格; 高對比標記; 數字刻度; 平行線參考線; 縫份參考線; 標準刻度標記; 其他
hu: Vonalzó jelölési stílus: Szögvonalak; Középvonal; Sarokjelölések; Rács; Nagy kontrasztú jelölések; Számozott beosztás; Párhuzamos segédvonalak; Varrásráhagyás-jelölések; Szabványos beosztás; Egyéb
fi: Viivaimen merkintätyyli: Kulmaviivat; Keskiviiva; Kulmamerkinnät; Ruudukko; Suuren kontrastin merkinnät; Numeroidut välit; Rinnakkaiset apuviivat; Saumanvaramerkinnät; Tavalliset asteikkomerkit; Muu
cs: Styl značení pravítka: Úhlové čáry; Středová čára; Rohové značení; Mřížka; Vysoce kontrastní značení; Číslované dílky; Vodítka rovnoběžných čar; Vodítka švových přídavků; Standardní rysky; Jiné
it: Stile di marcatura del righello: Linee angolari; Linea centrale; Marcature angolari; Griglia; Marcature ad alto contrasto; Incrementi numerati; Guide a linee parallele; Guide per margini di cucitura; Tacche standard; Altro
lt-LT: Liniuotės žymėjimo stilius: Kampų linijos; Centrinė linija; Kampų žymos; Tinklelis; Didelio kontrasto žymos; Sunumeruotos padalos; Lygiagrečių linijų kreiptuvai; Siūlės užlaidos kreiptuvai; Standartinės padalos; Kita
ru: Стиль разметки линейки: Угловые линии; Центральная линия; Угловая разметка; Сетка; Высококонтрастная разметка; Пронумерованные деления; Направляющие параллельных линий; Направляющие для припусков на швы; Стандартные штрихи; Другое
es: Estilo de marcado de regla: Líneas de ángulo; Línea central; Marcas de esquina; Cuadrícula; Marcas de alto contraste; Incrementos numerados; Guías de líneas paralelas; Guías de margen de costura; Marcas de graduación estándar; Otro
da: Linealmarkeringsstil: Vinkellinjer; Midterlinje; Hjørnemarkeringer; Gitter; Markeringer med høj kontrast; Nummererede intervaller; Parallelle hjælpelinjer; Hjælpelinjer til sømrum; Standard-skalastreger; Andet
th: รูปแบบการทำเครื่องหมายด้วยไม้บรรทัด: เส้นบอกมุม; เส้นกลาง; เครื่องหมายมุม; กริด; เครื่องหมายคอนทราสต์สูง; ตัวเลขบอกระยะ; เส้นนำคู่ขนาน; เส้นนำเผื่อเย็บ; ขีดสเกลมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
en: Ruler marking style: Angle lines; Center line; Corner markings; Grid; High-contrast markings; Numbered increments; Parallel line guides; Seam allowance guides; Standard tick marks; Other
sv: Linjalens markeringsstil: Vinkellinjer; Mittlinje; Hörnmarkeringar; Rutnät; Högkontrastmarkeringar; Numrerade steg; Parallella linjeguider; Sömsmånsguider; Standardmarkeringar; Övrigt
fr: Type de repères de la règle: Lignes d’angle; Ligne centrale; Repères d’angle; Grille; Repères à contraste élevé; Incréments numérotés; Guides de lignes parallèles; Guides de marge de couture; Graduations standards; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de marcação da régua: Linhas de ângulo; Linha central; Marcações de canto; Grelha; Marcações de alto contraste; Incrementos numerados; Guias de linhas paralelas; Guias de margem de costura; Marcas de medição padrão; Outro
vi: Kiểu vạch thước: Đường đo góc; Đường tâm; Vạch chia góc; Lưới; Vạch chia độ tương phản cao; Vạch chia có số; Đường dẫn song song; Đường viền may; Vạch đánh dấu tiêu chuẩn; Khác
de: Stil der Linealmarkierungen: Winkellinien; Mittellinie; Eckmarkierungen; Raster; Kontrastreiche Markierungen; Nummerierte Teilstriche; Parallele Führungslinien; Nahtzugabe-Markierungen; Standard-Teilstriche; Sonstiges
ja: 定規の目盛りのスタイル: 角度線; センターライン; コーナー目盛り; グリッド; ハイコントラスト目盛り; 番号付き目盛り; 平行線ガイド; 縫い代ガイド; 標準目盛り; その他
sl-SI: Stil oznak ravnila: Črte za kote; Središčna črta; Kotne oznake; Mreža; Visokokontrastne oznake; Oštevilčeni prirastki; Vodila za vzporedne črte; Vodila za dodatek za šiv; Standardne črtice; Drugo
pl: Styl oznaczeń linijki: Linie kątowe; Linia środkowa; Oznaczenia narożnikowe; Siatka; Oznaczenia o wysokim kontraście; Numerowana podziałka; Prowadnice linii równoległych; Prowadnice dodatku na szew; Standardowe znaczniki; Inne
sk-SK: Štýl značenia pravítka: Čiary uhlov; Stredová čiara; Rohové značky; Mriežka; Vysokokontrastné značky; Číslované dieliky; Vodiace čiary rovnobežiek; Vodiace čiary na prídavok na švy; Štandardné dieliky; Iné
zh-CN: 尺子刻度样式: 角度线; 中心线; 边角标记; 网格; 高对比度标记; 带数字刻度; 平行参考线; 缝份参考线; 标准刻度线; 其他
tr: Cetvel işaretleme stili: Açı çizgileri; Merkez çizgisi; Köşe işaretleri; Izgara; Yüksek kontrastlı işaretler; Numaralandırılmış aralıklar; Paralel çizgi kılavuzları; Dikiş payı kılavuzları; Standart ölçek çizgileri; Diğer
pt-BR: Régua estilo de marcação: Linhas de ângulo; Linha central; Marcações de canto; Grade; Marcações de alto contraste; Incrementos numerados; Guias de linha paralela; Guias de margem de costura; Marcações padrão; Outros
el: Στυλ σήμανσης με χάρακα: Γραμμές γωνίας; Κεντρική γραμμή; Διαγραμμίσεις γωνίας; Πλέγμα; Διαγραμμίσεις υψηλής αντίθεσης; Αριθμημένες διαβαθμίσεις; Οδηγοί παράλληλων γραμμών; Οδηγοί περιθωρίου ραφής; Τυπικές διαβαθμίσεις; Άλλο
ko: 자 표시 방식: 각도선; 중심선; 모서리 눈금; 그리드; 고대비 눈금; 숫자 눈금; 평행선 가이드; 시접 가이드; 표준 눈금 표시; 기타
hr-HR: Stil označavanja ravnalom: Linije kutova; Središnja linija; Kutne oznake; Mreža; Oznake visokog kontrasta; Numerirani podioci; Vodilice paralelnih linija; Vodilice za dodatak za šav; Standardne oznake; Ostalo